District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

19-101

Family allowance; construction; penalties.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 693, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Aug. 11, 1971, 85 Stat. 314, Pub. L. 92-88, § 5
June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 204(a), 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 2, 42 DCR 63
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 801(b), 48 DCR 2087

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 19-101.
1973 Ed., § 19-101.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of § 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, see § 2 of the Probate Reform Act of 1994 Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-79, June 28, 1995, 42 DCR 3452).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241: Section 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, as amended by § 2 of D.C. Law 11-54, provided that the act shall be applicable to estates of decedents who died on or after July 1, 1995.

Section 1102 of D.C. Law 13-292 provided: “Sec. 1102. Applicability. For the purposes of Title 5 and Title 9 and sections 801(b), 805, and 806 of Title 8 of this act, the provisions relating to the administration of decedents’ estates shall apply only to the estates of decedents who die on or after the effective date of this act.”

Section 31 of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that Title 19 is designated Title 19 of the District of Columbia Official Code.